Idaho, session 2025, H0085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1811, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1811. MANNER OF VOTING -- PROCEDURE WHEN CONFLICTING MEASURES AP-
PROVED. The manner of voting upon on measures submitted to the people shall
be the same as is now or may be required and provided by law; no measure shall
be adopted unless it shall receive an affirmative majority of the aggregate
number of votes cast on such measure, and, in the case of an initiative peti-
tion, meet the requirements of section 34-1813(2), Idaho Code. If two (2) or
more conflicting laws shall be approved by the people at the same election,
the law receiving that receives the greatest number of affirmative votes
shall be paramount in all particulars as to which there is a conflict, even
though such law may not have received the greatest majority of affirmative
votes. If two (2) or more conflicting amendments to the constitution shall
be approved by the people at the same election, the amendment which that
receives the greatest number of affirmative votes shall be paramount in all
particulars as to which there is a conflict, even though such amendment may
not have received the greatest majority of affirmative votes.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-1813, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1813. COUNTING, CANVASSING AND RETURN OF VOTES -- GOVERNOR'S VETO
-- VETO OVERRIDE BY THE VOTERS -- EFFECTIVE DATES. (1) The votes on measures
and questions shall be counted, canvassed, and returned by the regular
boards of judges, clerks, and officers, as votes for candidates are counted,
canvassed, and returned, and the abstract made by the several county au-
ditors of votes on measures shall be returned to the secretary of state on
separate abstract sheets in the manner provided for abstract of votes for
state and county officers. It shall be the duty of the secretary of state, in
the presence of the governor, to proceed within thirty (30) days after the
election, and sooner if the returns be all received, to canvass the votes
given for each measure, and the governor shall forthwith issue his procla-
mation, giving the whole number of votes cast in the state for and against


such measure and question and declaring such measures as are approved by a
majority of those voted thereon.
(2) If an initiative petition is approved by at least two-thirds (2/3)
of the voters, the initiative petition shall be approved without the need
for the governor's approval and it shall be in full force and effect as the
law of the state of Idaho from the effective date provided in the initiative
or, if no effective date is provided, from the date of the governor's procla-
mation provided in subsection (1) of this section. If an initiative peti-
tion is approved by at least a majority of voters, but less than two-thirds
(2/3) of the voters, the governor shall have five (5) days from the date of
the governor's proclamation to either approve or veto the initiative peti-
tion. If the governor approves of an initiative petition, the governor shall
sign it and it shall be in full force and effect as the law of the state of
Idaho from the effective date provided in the initiative or, if no effective
date is provided, from the date of the governor's signature. If the governor
does not approve of an initiative petition, the governor may veto the initia-
tive petition within five (5) days from the date of the governor's proclama-
tion by filing it with the secretary of state along with written objections.
The secretary of state shall then cause the initiative petition to be once
again submitted to the voters at the next general election in compliance with
the provisions of sections 34-1810, 34-1812, and 34-1812C, Idaho Code. If
at least two-thirds (2/3) of the voters approve the re-submitted initiative
petition at the next general election, it shall become law, notwithstand-
ing the objections of the governor and in the same manner and with the same
effective date as an initiative petition approved by the majority of voters
and neither approved nor vetoed by the governor. If the governor neither ap-
proves nor vetoes the initiative petition within five (5) days from the date
of the governor's proclamation, it shall be deemed approved by the governor
and shall be in full force and effect as the law of the state of Idaho from the
effective date provided in the initiative or, if no effective date is pro-
vided, five (5) days after the governor's proclamation.
(3) A referendum petition approved by the majority of the voters shall
to be in full force and effect as the law of the state of Idaho from the date of
said the governor's proclamation for any referendum measure. The effective
date for an initiative measure shall be governed by the provisions of subsec-
tion (2) of this section.
(4) If two (2) or more measures shall be approved at said as a result of
the same election which are known to conflict with each other or to contain
conflicting provisions, he the governor shall also proclaim which is para-
mount in accordance with the provisions of sections 34-1801 through 34-1822,
Idaho Code.
(2)(a) A statewide initiative may contain an effective date, if passed,
that shall be no earlier than July 1 of the year following the vote on the
ballot initiative. If no effective date is specified in the petition,
the effective date of a statewide initiative that has been approved by
the electorate shall be July 1 of the following year.
(b) (5) A city or county initiative may contain an effective date, if
passed, that may be earlier than July 1 of the year following the vote on the
ballot city or county initiative, but no earlier than the mayor's proclama-
tion as provided in section 34-1801B, Idaho Code, or the proclamation by the


board of county commissioners, as provided in section 34-1801C, Idaho Code.
If no effective date is specified in the petition, the effective date of a
city or county initiative that has been approved by the electorate shall be
July 1 of the following year.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.